Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.305

Model schools and training departments—Trustees to estimate number of pupils required.

The board of trustees of any regional university having a model school or training department as authorized by RCW 28B.35.300, shall, on or before the first Monday of September of each year, file with the board of the school district or districts in which such regional university is situated, a certified statement showing an estimate of the number of public school pupils who will be required to make up such model school and specifying the number required for each grade for which training for students is required.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 55. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.305; prior: 1907 c 97 s 1; RRS s 4612. Formerly RCW 28B.40.305, part; 28.81.059; 28.81.050(13).]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.